Missouri, session 2026, SB1132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.013, 115.045, 115.051, 115.065,
115.225, 115.227, 115.229, 115.233, 115.235, 115.237, 115.249,
115.255, 115.257, 115.259, 115.261, 115.263, 115.265, 115.267,
115.269, 115.271, 115.273, 115.415, 115.417, 115.419, 115.421,
115.423, 115.430, 115.433, 115.436, 115.439, 115.443, 115.447,
115.456, 115.459, 115.461, 115.467, 115.469, 115.471, 115.473,
115.475, 115.477, 115.479, 115.481, 115.483, 115.495, 115.501,
115.503, 115.541, 115.585, 115.631, 115.633, and 115.655, RSMo,
are repealed and twenty-seven new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 115.013, 115.045, 115.051,
115.065, 115.225, 115.226, 115.237, 115.415, 115.417, 115.419,
115.421, 115.423, 115.430, 115.433, 115.436, 115.439, 115.443,
115.447, 115.456, 115.459, 115.461, 115.501, 115.541, 115.585,
115.631, 115.633, and 115.655, to read as follows:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1132 2
115.013. As used in this chapter, unless the context
clearly implies otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) ["Air-gap" or "air-gapped", a security measure in
which equipment is physically and technically isolated from
any network and is not directly connected to the internet
nor is it connected to any other system that is connected to
the internet. Data can only be passed to an air-gapped
device physically via a USB or other removable media;
(2) "Automatic tabulating equipment", the apparatus
necessary to examine and automatically count votes, and the
data processing machines which are used for counting votes
and tabulating results and which are air-gapped and not
physically able to be connected to a network;
(3)] "Ballot", the paper ballot[, or ballot designed
for use with an electronic voting system] on which each
voter may cast all votes to which he or she is entitled at
an election;
[(4)] (2) "Ballot label", the card, paper, booklet,
page, or other material containing the names of all offices
and candidates and statements of all questions to be voted
on;
[(5)] (3) "Counting location", a location selected by
the election authority for the automatic processing or
counting, or both, of ballots;
[(6)] (4) "County", any county in this state or any
city not within a county;
[(7)] (5) "Disqualified", a determination made by a
court of competent jurisdiction, the Missouri ethics
commission, an election authority or any other body
authorized by law to make such a determination that a
candidate is ineligible to hold office or not entitled to be
voted on for office;

SB 1132 3
[(8)] (6) "District", an area within the state or
within a political subdivision of the state from which a
person is elected to represent the area on a policy-making
body with representatives of other areas in the state or
political subdivision;
[(9) "Electronic voting machine", any part of an air-
gapped electronic voting system on which a voter is able to
cast a ballot under this chapter;
(10) "Electronic voting system", a system of casting
votes by use of marking devices, and counting votes by use
of automatic air-gapped tabulating or air-gapped data
processing equipment, including computerized voting systems
that mark or tabulate ballots;
(11)] (7) "Established political party" for the state,
a political party which, at either of the last two general
elections, polled for its candidate for any statewide office
more than two percent of the entire vote cast for the
office. "Established political party" for any district or
political subdivision shall mean a political party which
polled more than two percent of the entire vote cast at
either of the last two elections in which the district or
political subdivision voted as a unit for the election of
officers or representatives to serve its area;
[(12)] (8) "Federal office", the office of
presidential elector, United States senator, or
representative in Congress;
[(13)] (9) "Independent", a candidate who is not a
candidate of any political party and who is running for an
office for which political party candidates may run;
[(14)] (10) "Major political party", the political
party whose candidates received the highest or second
highest number of votes at the last general election;

SB 1132 4
[(15) "Marking device", any device approved by the
secretary of state under section 115.225 which will enable
the votes to be counted by automatic tabulating equipment;
(16)] (11) "Municipal" or "municipality", a city,
village, or incorporated town of this state;
[(17)] (12) "New party", any political group which has
filed a valid petition and is entitled to place its list of
candidates on the ballot at the next general or special
election;
[(18)] (13) "Nonpartisan", a candidate who is not a
candidate of any political party and who is running for an
office for which party candidates may not run;
[(19)] (14) "Political party", any established
political party and any new party;
[(20)] (15) "Political subdivision", a county, city,
town, village, or township of a township organization county;
[(21)] (16) "Polling place", the voting place
designated for all voters residing in one or more precincts
for any election;
[(22)] (17) "Precincts", the geographical areas into
which the election authority divides its jurisdiction for
the purpose of conducting elections;
[(23)] (18) "Public office", any office established by
constitution, statute or charter and any employment under
the United States, the state of Missouri, or any political
subdivision or special district thereof, but does not
include any office in the Missouri state defense force or
the National Guard or the office of notary public or city
attorney in cities of the third classification or cities of
the fourth classification;
[(24)] (19) "Question", any measure on the ballot
which can be voted "YES" or "NO";

SB 1132 5
[(25)] (20) "Relative within the second degree by
consanguinity or affinity", a spouse, parent, child,
grandparent, brother, sister, grandchild, mother-in-law,
100 father-in-law, daughter-in-law, or son-in-law;
101 [(26)] (21) "Special district", any school district,
102 water district, fire protection district, hospital district,
103 health center, nursing district, or other districts with
104 taxing authority, or other district formed pursuant to the
105 laws of Missouri to provide limited, specific services;
106 [(27)] (22) "Special election", elections called by
107 any school district, water district, fire protection
108 district, or other district formed pursuant to the laws of
109 Missouri to provide limited, specific services; and
110 [(28)] (23) "Voting district", the one or more
111 precincts within which all voters vote at a single polling
112 place for any election.
115.045. Each election authority shall have the
authority to employ such attorneys and other employees as
may be necessary to promptly and correctly perform the
duties of the election authority. Where [an electronic
voting system or] voting machines authorized under section
115.226 are used, the election authority shall designate
competent employees to have custody of and supervise
maintenance of the voting equipment. Board of election
commissioners' employees shall be subject to the same
restrictions and subscribe the same oath as members of the
board of election commissioners, except that no employee of
a board of election commissioners shall be required to post
bond or reside and be a registered voter within the
jurisdiction of the election authority unless directed to do
so by the board. Employee oaths and any bonds shall be
filed and preserved in the office of the board.

SB 1132 6
115.051. 1. In each county which does not have a
board of election commissioners, the county clerk shall have
the right to employ such deputies and assistants as are
necessary to promptly and correctly register voters and
conduct elections. Where [an electronic voting system or]
voting machines authorized under section 115.226 are used,
the county clerk shall designate competent employees to have
custody of and supervise maintenance of the voting
equipment. Each deputy shall be subject to the same
restrictions and subscribe the same oath as the county
clerk, except that no employee shall be required to post
bond or reside and be a registered voter within the
jurisdiction of the election authority unless directed to do
so by the clerk. Employee oaths and any bonds shall be
filed and preserved in the office of the county clerk.
2. Within the total amount for deputies and assistants
approved by the county commission, the salary of each deputy
and assistant shall be set by the county clerk.
115.065. 1. Except as provided in sections 115.069,
115.071, 115.073 and 115.077, when any question or candidate
is submitted to a vote by two or more political subdivisions
or special districts, or by the state and one or more
political subdivisions or special districts at the same
election, all costs of the election shall be paid
proportionally from the general revenues of the state and
all political subdivisions and special districts submitting
a question or candidate at the election, except that costs
of publications of legal notice of elections shall not be
paid proportionally. The state and each political
subdivision and each special district shall pay for
publication of its legal notice of election. At the
discretion of the election authority, ballot printing costs,

SB 1132 7
if any, may be paid proportionally or the state and each
political subdivision and each special district may pay for
such ballot printing costs, if any.
2. Except as provided in sections 115.069, 115.071 and
115.073, when any question or candidate is submitted to a
vote by two or more political subdivisions or special
districts at the same election, all costs of the election
shall be paid proportionally from the general revenues of
all political subdivisions and special districts submitting
a question or candidate at the election.
3. Proportional election costs paid under the
provisions of subsection 2 of this section shall be assessed
by charging each political subdivision and special district
the same percentage of the total cost of the election as the
number of registered voters of the political subdivision or
special district on the day of the election is to the total
number of registered voters on the day of the election,
derived by adding together the number of registered voters
in each political subdivision and special district
submitting a question or candidate at the election.
4. "Proportional costs" and "election costs", as used
in this chapter, are defined as those costs that require
additional out-of-pocket expense by the election authority
in conducting an election. It may include reimbursement to
county general revenue for the salaries of employees of the
election authority for the hours worked to conduct an
election, the rental of any [electronic] voting machine
authorized under section 115.226 or electronic poll book,
any indirect expenses identified under an independent cost
allocation study and an amount not to exceed five percent of
the total cost of election to be credited to the election
services fund of the county. The election services fund

SB 1132 8
shall be budgeted and expended at the direction of the
election authority and shall not be used to substitute for
or subsidize any allocation of general revenue for the
operation of the election authority's office without the
express consent of the election authority. The election
services fund may be audited by the appropriate auditing
agency, and any unexpended balance shall be left in the fund
to accumulate from year to year with interest. The election
services fund shall be used by the election authority for
training programs and purchase of additional supplies or
equipment to improve the conduct of elections, including
anything necessarily pertaining thereto. In addition to
these costs, the state shall, subject to appropriation,
compensate the election services fund for transactions
submitted pursuant to the provisions of section 115.157.
115.225. 1. [Before use by election authorities in
this state, the secretary of state shall approve the marking
devices and the automatic tabulating equipment used in
electronic voting systems and may promulgate rules and
regulations to implement the intent of sections 115.225 to
115.235.
2. No electronic voting system shall be approved
unless it:
(1) Permits voting in absolute secrecy;
(2) Permits each voter to vote for as many candidates
for each office as a voter is lawfully entitled to vote for;
(3) Permits each voter to vote for or against as many
questions as a voter is lawfully entitled to vote on, and no
more;
(4) Provides facilities for each voter to cast as many
write-in votes for each office as a voter is lawfully
entitled to cast;

SB 1132 9
(5) Permits each voter in a primary election to vote
for the candidates of only one party announced by the voter
in advance;
(6) Permits each voter at a presidential election to
vote by use of a single mark for the candidates of one party
or group of petitioners for president, vice president and
their presidential electors;
(7) Accurately counts all proper votes cast for each
candidate and for and against each question;
(8) Is set to reject all votes, except write-in votes,
for any office and on any question when the number of votes
exceeds the number a voter is lawfully entitled to cast;
(9) Permits each voter, while voting, to clearly see
the ballot label;
(10) Has been tested and is certified by an
independent authority that meets the voting system standards
developed by the Federal Election Commission or its
successor agency. The provisions of this subdivision shall
not be required for any system purchased prior to August 28,
2002.
3. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and
regulations to allow the use of a computerized voting
system. The procedures shall provide for the use of a
computerized voting system with the ability to provide a
paper audit trail. Notwithstanding any provisions of this
chapter to the contrary, such a system may allow for the
storage of processed ballot materials in an electronic form.
4. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section

SB 1132 10
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be
invalid and void.
5. If any election authority uses any] Touchscreen
direct-recording electronic vote-counting [machine, the
election authority may continue to use such machine. Upon
the removal of such voting machine from the election
authority's inventory because of mechanical malfunction,
wear and tear, or any other reason, the machine shall not be
replaced and no additional direct-recording electronic vote-
counting machine shall be added to the election authority's
inventory. Such] machines shall not be used [beginning
January 1, 2024. Equipment that is designed for
accessibility shall provide a paper ballot audit trail].
[6.] 2. (1) Each election authority that controls its
own information technology department shall, once every two
years, allow a cyber security review of their office by the
secretary of state or alternatively by an entity that
specializes in cyber security reviews. Each political
subdivision that controls the information technology
department for an election authority shall, once every two
years, allow a cyber security review of the information
technology department by the secretary of state or
alternatively by an entity that specializes in cyber
security reviews. The secretary of state shall, once every
two years, allow a cyber security review of its office by an
entity that specializes in cyber security reviews. For

SB 1132 11
purposes of this section, an entity specializes in cyber
security review if it employs one or more individuals who:
(a) Have at least five years management experience in
information security or five years' experience as an
information security analyst;
(b) Have worked in at least two of the domains listed
in paragraph (c) of this subdivision that are covered in the
exam required by such paragraph; and
(c) Have attained an information security
certification by passing an exam that covers at least three
of the following topics:
a. Information technology risk management,
identification, mitigation, and compliance;
b. Information security incident management;
c. Information security program development and
management;
d. Risk and control monitoring and reporting;
e. Access control systems and methodology;
f. Business continuity planning and disaster recovery
100 planning;
101 g. Physical security of election authority property;
102 h. Networking security; or
103 i. Security architecture application and systems
104 development.
105 (2) If an election authority or political subdivision
106 fails to have a cyber security review as required by this
107 subsection, the secretary of state may publish a notice of
108 noncompliance in a newspaper within the jurisdiction of the
109 election authority or in electronic format. The secretary
110 of state is also authorized to withhold funds from an
111 election authority in violation of this section unless such

SB 1132 12
112 funding is a federal mandate or part of a federal and state
113 agreement.
114 [7.] 3. The secretary of state shall have authority to
115 require cyber security testing, including penetration
116 testing, of vendor machines, programs, and systems. Failure
117 to participate in such testing shall result in a revocation
118 of vendor certification. Upon notice from another
119 jurisdiction of cyber security failures or certification
120 withholds or revocation, the secretary of state shall have
121 authority to revoke or withhold certification for vendors.
122 The requirements of this section shall be subject to
123 appropriation for the purpose of cyber security testing.
124 [8.] 4. The secretary of state may designate an
125 organization of which each election authority shall be a
126 member, provided there is no membership fee and the
127 organization provides information to increase cyber security
128 and election integrity efforts.
129 [9.] 5. All audits required by subsection [6] 2 of
130 this section that are conducted by the secretary of state
131 shall be solely paid for by state and federal funding.
115.226. 1. Each election authority shall ensure that
each polling place has in its jurisdiction a sufficient
number of voting machines that are designed for
accessibility for all elections. Such machines shall comply
with the provisions of Section 301 of the federal Help
America Vote Act, 52 U.S.C. Section 21081. Additionally,
such machines shall print out a paper ballot for each voter
who casts a ballot using the machine that is identical to
the ballot required by section 115.237. The ballot printed
out shall contain a distinguishing mark beside each
candidate and question the voter has voted for.

SB 1132 13
2. The secretary of state shall maintain a database
containing the names of all individuals who are eligible to
use a voting machine designed for accessibility pursuant to
this section. Registered voters may submit requests to be
included in such database. The database shall be updated as
changes are made and every thirty days election authorities
shall be given an updated list of registered voters in the
jurisdiction of the election authority who are eligible to
use such machines. Only registered voters who appear on the
list may cast a ballot using a voting machine authorized
under this section.
115.237. 1. [Each ballot printed or designed for use
with an electronic voting system for any election pursuant
to this chapter shall contain all questions and the names of
all offices and candidates certified or filed pursuant to
this chapter and no other.] Beginning January 1, 2023, the
official ballot shall be a paper ballot that is hand-marked
by the voter or by the voter's designee as permitted in
section 115.445[, unless such voter chooses to use a ballot-
marking device as provided in section 115.225]. As far as
practicable, all questions and the names of all offices and
candidates for which each voter is entitled to vote shall be
printed on one page except for the ballot for political
party committee persons [in polling places not utilizing an
electronic voting system] which may be printed separately
and in conformity with the requirements contained in this
section. As far as practicable, ballots containing only
questions and the names of nonpartisan offices and
candidates shall be printed in accordance with the
provisions of this section, except that the ballot
information may be listed in vertical or horizontal rows.

SB 1132 14
The names of candidates for each office shall be listed in
the order in which they are filed.
2. [In polling places using electronic voting systems,
the ballot information may be arranged in vertical or
horizontal rows or on a number of separate pages or
screens. In any event,] The name of each candidate, the
candidate's party, the office for which he or she is a
candidate, and each question shall be indicated clearly on
the ballot.
3. [Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as
prohibiting the use of a separate paper ballot for questions
or for the presidential preference primary in any polling
place using an electronic voting system.
4. Where electronic voting systems are used and] When
write-in votes are authorized by law, a write-in ballot,
which may be in the form of a separate paper ballot, card,
or envelope, may be provided by the election authority to
permit each voter to write in the names of persons whose
names do not appear on the ballot.
[5.] 4. No ballot [printed or designed for use with an
electronic voting system for any partisan election held
under this chapter] shall allow a person to vote a straight
political party ticket. For purposes of this subsection, a
"straight political party ticket" means voting for all of
the candidates for elective office who are on the ballot
representing a single political party by a single selection
on the ballot.
[6. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules that
specify uniform standards for ballot layout for each
electronic or computerized ballot counting system approved
under the provisions of section 115.225 so that the ballot
used with any counting system is, where possible, consistent

SB 1132 15
with the intent of this section. Nothing in this section
shall be construed to require the format specified in this
section if it does not meet the requirements of the ballot
counting system used by the election authority.
7.] 5. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be
invalid and void.
115.415. Before the time fixed by law for the opening
of the polls, the election authority shall deliver to the
authorized election officials or to the polling place the
appropriate ballots, ballot boxes, precinct registers,
voting booths, voting machines authorized under section
115.226 and all other supplies, material and equipment
necessary and appropriate for the polling place. The
election authority shall make and preserve a record of each
delivery.
115.417. 1. Before the time fixed by law for the
opening of the polls, the election authority shall deliver
to each polling place a sufficient number of voter
instruction cards which include the following information:
how to obtain a ballot for voting, how to vote and prepare
the ballot for deposit in the ballot box, and how to obtain
a new ballot to replace one accidentally spoiled.

SB 1132 16
2. The election authority at each polling place shall
post in a conspicuous place voting instructions on a poster
no smaller than twenty-four inches by thirty inches. Such
instructions shall also inform the voter that the
[electronic voting equipment] voting machines authorized
under section 115.226 can be demonstrated upon request of
the voter. The election authority shall also publicly post
during the period of time in which a person may cast an
absentee ballot and on election day a sample version of the
ballot that will be used for that election, the date of the
election, the hours during which the polling place will be
open, instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time
voters, general information on voting rights in accordance
with the state plan filed by the secretary of state pursuant
to the Help America Vote Act of 2002, general information on
the right to cast a provisional ballot and instructions for
provisional ballots, how to contact appropriate authorities
if voting rights have been violated, and general information
on federal and Missouri law regarding prohibitions on acts
of fraud and misrepresentation. The secretary of state may
promulgate rules to execute this section. No rule or
portion of a rule promulgated pursuant to the authority of
this section shall become effective unless it has been
promulgated pursuant to chapter 536.
3. The secretary of state may develop multilingual
voting instructions to be made available to election
authorities.
115.419. Before the time fixed by law for the opening
of the polls, the election authority shall deliver to each
polling place a sufficient number of sample ballots [and
ballot cards] which shall be a different color but otherwise
exact copies of the official ballot. The samples shall be

SB 1132 17
printed in the form of a diagram, showing the form of the
ballot [or the front of the marking device or voting
machine] as it will appear on election day. The secretary
of state may develop multilingual sample ballots to be made
available to election authorities.
115.421. Before the time fixed by law for the opening
of the polls, the election judges shall:
(1) Set up the voting equipment, arrange the
furniture, supplies and records and make all other
arrangements necessary to open the polls at the time fixed
by law;
(2) Post a voter instruction card in each voting booth
or machine and in at least one other conspicuous place
within the polling place and post a sample ballot in a
conspicuous place near the voting booths;
(3) Certify the number of ballots received at each
polling place[. In each polling place using voting
machines, the election judges shall, in lieu of certifying
the number of ballots received, certify the number on each
voting machine received at the polling place, the number on
the seal of each voting machine, the number on the
protective counter of each voting machine and that all
recording counters on all voting machines at the polling
place are set at zero. If a recording counter on any voting
machine is not set at zero, the election judges shall
immediately notify the election authority and proceed as it
directs];
(4) Compare the ballot[, ballot label or ballot card]
and ballot label with the sample ballots, see that the
names, numbers and letters agree and certify thereto in the
tally book. If the names, numbers or letters do not agree,

SB 1132 18
the election judges shall immediately notify the election
authority and proceed as it directs; and
(5) Sign the tally book in the manner provided in the
form for tally books in section 115.461 or 115.473. If any
election judge, challenger or watcher has not been
previously sworn as the law directs, he or she shall take
and subscribe the oath of his or her office as provided in
section 115.091 or 115.109, and the oath shall be returned
to the election authority with the tally book.
115.423. Not more than one hour before the voting
begins, the election judges shall open the ballot box and
show to all present that it is empty. The ballot box shall
then be locked and the key kept by one of the election
judges. The ballot box shall not be opened or removed from
public view from the time it is shown to be empty until the
polls close or until the ballot box is delivered for
counting pursuant to section 115.451. [If voting machines
are used, the election judges shall call attention to the
counter on the face of each voting machine and show to all
present that it is set at zero.]
115.430. 1. This section shall apply to primary and
general elections where candidates for federal or statewide
offices are nominated or elected and any election where
statewide issue or issues are submitted to the voters.
2. (1) A voter claiming to be properly registered in
the jurisdiction of the election authority and eligible to
vote in an election, but whose eligibility at that precinct
cannot be immediately established upon examination of the
precinct register, shall be entitled to vote a provisional
ballot after providing a form of personal identification
required pursuant to section 115.427 or upon executing an
affidavit under section 115.427, or may vote at a central

SB 1132 19
polling place as established in section 115.115 where the
voter may vote his or her appropriate ballot for his or her
precinct of residence upon verification of eligibility or
vote a provisional ballot if eligibility cannot be
determined. The provisional ballot provided to a voter
under this section shall be the ballot provided to a
resident of the voter's precinct determined by reference to
the affidavit provided for in this section. If the voter
declares that the voter is eligible to vote and the election
authority determines that the voter is eligible to vote at
another polling place, the voter shall be directed to the
correct polling place or a central polling place as
established by the election authority pursuant to subsection
5 of section 115.115. If the voter refuses to go to the
correct polling place or a central polling place, the voter
shall be permitted to vote a provisional ballot at the
incorrect polling place, but such ballot shall not be
counted if the voter was not eligible to vote at that
polling place.
(2) The following steps shall be taken to establish a
voter's eligibility to vote at a polling place:
(a) The election judge shall examine the precinct
register as provided in section 115.425. If the voter is
registered and eligible to vote at the polling place, the
voter shall receive a regular ballot;
(b) If the voter's eligibility cannot be immediately
established by examining the precinct register, the election
judge shall contact the election authority. If the election
authority cannot immediately establish that the voter is
registered and eligible to vote at the polling place upon
examination of the Missouri voter registration system, or if
the election judge is unable to make contact with the

SB 1132 20
election authority immediately, the voter shall be notified
that the voter is entitled to a provisional ballot.
(3) The voter shall have the duty to appear and vote
at the correct polling place. If an election judge
determines that the voter is not eligible to vote at the
polling place at which a voter presents himself or herself,
and if the voter appears to be eligible to vote at another
polling place, the voter shall be informed that he or she
may cast a provisional ballot at the current polling place
or may travel to the correct polling place or a central
polling place, as established by the election authority
under subsection 5 of section 115.115, where the voter may
cast a regular ballot or provisional ballot if the voter's
eligibility still cannot be determined. Provisional ballots
cast at a polling place shall be counted only if the voter
was eligible to vote at such polling place as provided in
subsection 5 of this section.
(4) For a voter requesting an absentee ballot in
person, such voter shall be entitled to cast a provisional
ballot when the voter's eligibility cannot be immediately
established upon examination of the precinct registers or
the Missouri voter registration system.
(5) Prior to accepting any provisional ballot at the
polling place, the election judges shall determine that the
information provided on the provisional ballot envelope by
the provisional voter is consistent with the identification
provided by such person under section 115.427.
3. (1) No person shall be entitled to receive a
provisional ballot until such person has completed a
provisional ballot affidavit on the provisional ballot
envelope.

SB 1132 21
(2) The secretary of state shall produce appropriate
sizes of provisional ballot envelopes and distribute them to
each election authority according to their tabulating
system. All provisional ballot envelopes shall be printed
on a distinguishable color of paper that is different from
the color of the regular ballot. The provisional ballot
envelope shall be in the form required by subsection 4 of
this section. All provisional ballots shall be marked with
a conspicuous stamp or other distinguishing mark that makes
them readily distinguishable from the regular ballots.
(3) Once voted, the provisional ballot shall be placed
and sealed in a provisional ballot envelope.
4. The provisional ballot in its envelope shall be
deposited in the ballot box. The provisional ballot
envelope shall be completed by the voter for use in
determining eligibility. The provisional ballot envelope
specified in this section shall contain a voter's
certificate which shall be in substantially the following
form:
STATE OF ______
COUNTY OF ______
I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that my name is
______; that my date of birth is ______; that the last
four digits of my Social Security Number are ______;
100 that I am registered to vote in ______ County or City
101 (if a City not within a County), Missouri; that I am a
102 qualified voter of said County (or City not within a
103 County); that I am eligible to vote at this polling
104 place; and that I have not voted in this election.
105 I understand that if the above-provided information is
106 not correct and the election authority determines that
107 I am not registered and eligible to vote, my vote will

SB 1132 22
108 not be counted. I further understand that knowingly
109 providing false information is a violation of law and
110 subjects me to possible criminal prosecution.
111 __________________
112 (Signature of Voter)
113 __________________
114 (Current Address)
115 Subscribed and affirmed before me this ______ day of
116 ______, 20______
117 __________________
118 (Signature of Election Official)
119 The voter may provide additional information to further
120 assist the election authority in determining eligibility,
121 including the place and date the voter registered to vote,
122 if known.
123 5. (1) Prior to counting any provisional ballot, the
124 election authority shall determine if the voter is
125 registered and eligible to vote and if the vote was properly
126 cast. The eligibility of provisional votes shall be
127 determined according to the requirements for a voter to cast
128 a ballot in the election as set forth in sections 115.133
129 and 115.135. A provisional voter ballot shall not be
130 eligible to be counted until the election authority has
131 determined that:
132 (a) The voter cast such provisional ballot at a
133 polling place established for the voter or the central
134 polling place established by the election authority under
135 subsection 5 of section 115.115;

SB 1132 23
136 (b) The individual who cast the provisional ballot is
137 an individual registered to vote in the respective election
138 at the polling place where the ballot was cast;
139 (c) The voter did not otherwise vote in the same
140 election by regular ballot, absentee ballot, or otherwise;
141 and
142 (d) The information on the provisional ballot envelope
143 is found to be correct, complete, and accurate.
144 (2) When the ballot boxes are delivered to the
145 election authority from the polling places, the receiving
146 teams shall separate the provisional ballots from the rest
147 of the ballots and place the sealed provisional ballot
148 envelopes in a separate container. Teams of election
149 authority employees or teams of election judges with each
150 team consisting of one member of each major political party
151 shall photocopy each provisional ballot envelope, such
152 photocopy to be used by the election authority to determine
153 provisional voter eligibility. The sealed provisional
154 ballot envelopes shall be placed by the team in a sealed
155 container and shall remain therein until tabulation.
156 (3) To determine whether a provisional ballot is valid
157 and entitled to be counted, the election authority shall
158 examine its records and verify that the provisional voter is
159 properly registered and eligible to vote in the election.
160 If the provisional voter has provided information regarding
161 the registration agency where the provisional voter
162 registered to vote, the election authority shall make an
163 inquiry of the registration agency to determine whether the
164 provisional voter is properly registered and eligible to
165 vote in the election.
166 (4) If the election authority determines that the
167 provisional voter is registered and eligible to vote in the

SB 1132 24
168 election, the election authority shall provide documentation
169 verifying the voter's eligibility. Such documentation shall
170 be noted on the copy of the provisional ballot envelope and
171 shall contain substantially the following information:
172 (a) The name of the provisional voter;
173 (b) The name of the reviewer;
174 (c) The date and time; and
175 (d) A description of evidence found that supports the
176 voter's eligibility.
177 (5) The local election authority shall record on a
178 provisional ballot acceptance/rejection list the provisional
179 ballot identification number and a notation marking it as
180 accepted.
181 (6) If the election authority determines that the
182 provisional voter is not registered or eligible to vote in
183 the election, the election authority shall provide
184 documentation verifying the voter's ineligibility. Such
185 documentation shall be noted on the copy of the provisional
186 ballot envelope and shall contain substantially the
187 following information:
188 (a) The name of the provisional voter;
189 (b) The name of the reviewer;
190 (c) The date and time;
191 (d) A description of why the voter is ineligible.
192 (7) The local election authority shall record on a
193 provisional ballot acceptance/rejection list the provisional
194 ballot identification number and notation marking it as
195 rejected.
196 (8) If rejected, a photocopy of the envelope shall be
197 made and used by the election authority as a mail-in voter
198 registration. The actual provisional ballot envelope shall
199 be kept as ballot material, and the copy of the envelope

SB 1132 25
200 shall be used by the election authority for registration
201 record keeping.
202 6. All provisional ballots cast by voters whose
203 eligibility has been verified as provided in this section
204 shall be counted in accordance with the rules governing
205 ballot tabulation. Provisional ballots shall not be counted
206 until all provisional ballots are determined either eligible
207 or ineligible and all provisional ballots must be processed
208 before the election is certified. The provisional ballot
209 shall be counted only if the election authority determines
210 that the voter is registered and eligible to vote.
211 Provisional ballots voted in the wrong polling place shall
212 not be counted. If the voter is not registered but is
213 qualified to register for future elections, the affidavit
214 shall be considered a mail-in application to register to
215 vote pursuant to this chapter.
216 7. (1) After the election authority completes its
217 review of the provisional voter's eligibility under
218 subsection 5 of this section, the election authority shall
219 deliver the provisional ballots and copies of the
220 provisional ballot envelopes that include eligibility
221 information to bipartisan counting teams, which may be the
222 board of verification, for review and tabulation. The
223 election authority shall maintain a record of such
224 delivery. The record shall include the number of ballots
225 delivered to each team and shall include a signed receipt
226 from two judges, one from each major political party. The
227 election authority shall provide each team with a ballot box
228 and material necessary for tabulation.
229 (2) If the person named on the provisional ballot
230 affidavit is found to have been properly qualified and
231 registered to cast a ballot in the election and the

SB 1132 26
232 provisional ballot otherwise qualifies to be counted under
233 the provisions of this section, the envelope shall be
234 opened, and the ballot shall be placed in a ballot box to be
235 counted.
236 (3) If the person named on the provisional ballot
237 affidavit is found not to have been properly qualified and
238 registered to cast a ballot in the election or if the
239 election authority is unable to determine such person's
240 right to vote, the envelope containing the provisional
241 ballot shall not be opened, and the person's vote shall not
242 be counted. The members of the team shall follow the
243 procedures set forth in subsection 5 of this section for
244 rejected provisional ballots.
245 (4) The votes shall be tallied and the returns made as
246 provided in sections 115.447 to 115.525 [for paper ballots].
247 After the vote on all ballots assigned to a team have been
248 counted, the ballots, ballot envelopes, and copies of ballot
249 envelopes with the eligibility information provided by the
250 election authority shall be enclosed in sealed containers
251 marked "Voted provisional ballots and ballot envelopes from
252 the election held ______, 20______". All rejected
253 provisional ballots, ballot envelopes, and copies of ballot
254 envelopes with the eligibility information provided by the
255 election authority shall be enclosed in sealed containers
256 marked "Rejected provisional ballots and ballot envelopes
257 from the election held ______, 20______". On the outside of
258 each voted ballot and rejected ballot container, each member
259 of the team shall write their name and all such containers
260 shall be returned to the election authority. Upon receipt
261 of the returns and ballots, the election authority shall
262 tabulate the provisional votes.

SB 1132 27
263 8. Challengers and watchers, as provided by sections
264 115.105 and 115.107, may be present during all times that
265 the bipartisan counting teams are reviewing or counting the
266 provisional ballots, the provisional ballot envelopes, or
267 copies of the provisional ballot envelopes that include
268 eligibility information provided by the election authority.
269 Challengers and watchers shall be permitted to observe the
270 determination of the eligibility of all provisional
271 ballots. The election authority shall notify the county
272 chair of each major political party of the time and location
273 when bipartisan counting teams will be reviewing or counting
274 the provisional ballots, the provisional ballot envelopes,
275 or the copies of the provisional ballot envelopes that
276 include the eligibility information provided by the election
277 authority.
278 9. [The certificate of ballot cards shall:
279 (1) Reflect the number of provisional envelopes
280 delivered; and
281 (2) Reflect the number of sealed provisional envelopes
282 with voted ballots deposited in the ballot box.
283 10. In counties where the voting system does not
284 utilize a paper ballot, the election authority shall provide
285 the appropriate provisional ballots to each polling place.
286 11.] The secretary of state may promulgate rules for
287 purposes of ensuring the uniform application of this
288 section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant
289 to the authority of this section shall become effective
290 unless it has been promulgated pursuant to chapter 536.
291 [12.] 10. The secretary of state shall design and
292 provide to the election authorities the envelopes and forms
293 necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

SB 1132 28
294 [13.] 11. Pursuant to the Help America Vote Act of
295 2002, the secretary of state shall ensure a free access
296 system is established, such as a toll-free number or an
297 internet website, that any individual who casts a
298 provisional ballot may access to discover whether the vote
299 of that individual was counted, and, if the vote was not
300 counted, the reason that the vote was not counted. At the
301 time an individual casts a provisional ballot, the election
302 authority shall give the voter written information that
303 states that any individual who casts a provisional ballot
304 will be able to ascertain under such free access system
305 whether the vote was counted, and if the vote was not
306 counted, the reason that the vote was not counted.
307 [14.] 12. In accordance with the Help America Vote Act
308 of 2002, any individual who votes in an election as a result
309 of a court order or any other order extending the time
310 established for closing the polls in section 115.407 may
311 vote only by using a provisional ballot, and such
312 provisional ballot shall be separated and held apart from
313 other provisional ballots cast by those not affected by the
314 order. Such ballots shall not be counted until such time as
315 the ballots are determined to be valid. No state court
316 shall have jurisdiction to extend the polling hours
317 established by law, including section 115.407.
115.433. After the voter's identification certificate
has been initialed, two judges of different political
parties, or one judge from a major political party and one
judge with no political affiliation, shall[, where paper
ballots are used,] initial the voter's ballot [or ballot
card].
115.436. 1. [In jurisdictions using paper ballots and
electronic voting systems,] When any physically disabled

SB 1132 29
voter within two hundred feet of a polling place is unable
to enter the polling place, two election judges, one of each
major political party, shall take a ballot[, equipment] and
materials necessary for voting to the voter. The voter
shall mark the ballot, and the election judges shall place
the ballot in an envelope and place it in the ballot box.
2. [In jurisdictions using voting machines, when any
physically disabled voter within two hundred feet of a
polling place is unable to enter the polling place, two
election judges, one of each major political party, shall
take an absentee ballot to the voter. The voter shall mark
the ballot, and the election judges shall place the ballot
in an envelope and place it in the ballot box.
3.] Upon request to the election authority, the
election authority in any jurisdiction shall designate a
polling place accessible to any physically disabled voter
other than the polling place to which that voter would
normally be assigned to vote, provided that the candidates
and issues voted on are consistent for both the designated
location and the voting location for the voter's precinct.
Upon request, the election authority may also assign members
of the physically disabled voter's household and such
voter's caregiver to the same voting location as the
physically disabled voter. In no event shall a voter be
assigned under this section to a designated location apart
from the established voting location for the voter's
precinct if the voter objects to the assignment to another
location.
115.439. 1. [If paper ballots are used,] The voter
shall, immediately upon receiving [his] a ballot, go alone
to a voting booth and vote [his] the ballot in the following
manner:

SB 1132 30
(1) When a voter desires to vote for a candidate, the
voter shall place a distinguishing mark immediately beside
the name of the candidate for which the voter intends to
vote;
(2) If a write-in line appears on the ballot, the
voter may write the name of the person for whom he or she
wishes to vote on the line and place a distinguishing mark
immediately beside the name;
(3) If the ballot is one which contains no candidates,
the voter shall place a distinguishing mark directly to the
left of each "YES" or "NO" he or she desires to vote.
No voter shall vote for the same person more than once for
the same office at the same election.
2. If the voter accidentally spoils [his] the ballot
[or ballot card] or makes an error, [he] the voter may
return it to an election judge and receive another. The
election judge shall mark "SPOILED" across the ballot [or
ballot card] and place it in an envelope marked "SPOILED
BALLOTS". After another ballot has been prepared in the
manner provided in section 115.433, the ballot shall be
given to the voter for voting.
3. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and

SB 1132 31
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be
invalid and void.
115.443. 1. [Where paper ballots are used,] The voter
shall, before leaving the voting booth, fold [his] the
ballot so that the distinguishing marks are concealed. The
voter shall place [his] the ballot in the ballot box and
leave the polling place immediately.
2. [Where electronic] In case of voting machines [are
used,] authorized under section 115.226, the voter shall
register [his] a vote as directed in the instructions for
use of the machine, fold the printed ballot so that the
distinguishing marks are concealed, place the ballot in the
ballot box, and leave the polling place immediately.
115.447. [1.] As used in [this subchapter] sections
115.447 to 115.483, unless the context clearly implies
otherwise, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Counting judges" are the two judges, one from
each major political party, who read each vote received by
all candidates and each vote for and against all questions
at a polling place;
(2) "Receiving judges" are the two judges, one from
each major political party, who initial each voter's ballot
at a polling place;
(3) "Recording judges" are the two judges, one from
each major political party, who tally the votes received by
each candidate and for and against each question at a
polling place. These terms describe functions rather than
individuals, and any election judge may perform more than
one function at a polling place on election day[.];
[2. As used in this subchapter, unless the context
clearly implies otherwise, the following terms shall mean:

SB 1132 32
(1)] (4) "Defective ballot" is any ballot on which the
number of write-in votes and votes cast on the ballot for
any office exceed the number allowed by law[, and any ballot
which is bent or damaged so that it cannot be properly
counted by automatic tabulating equipment];
[(2)] (5) "Rejected ballot" is any ballot on which no
votes are counted because the ballot fails to have the
initials of the proper election judges, because the number
of votes for all offices and on all questions exceeds the
number authorized by law, because the voter is deemed by the
election judges to be unqualified, because it is an absentee
ballot not accompanied by a completed and signed affidavit,
or because the ballot was voted with unlawful assistance;
[(3)] (6) "Spoiled ballot" is any ballot accidentally
spoiled by a voter and replaced by election judges in the
manner provided in subsection 2 of section 115.439.
115.456. 1. [(1) The election authority shall be
responsible for ensuring that the standards provided for in
this subsection are followed when counting ballots cast
using optical scan voting systems.
(2) Prior to tabulating ballots, all machines shall be
programmed to reject blank ballots where no votes are
recorded or where an overvote is registered in any race.
(3) In jurisdictions using precinct-based tabulators,
the voter who cast the ballot shall review the ballot if
rejected, if the voter wishes to make any changes to the
ballot, or if the voter would like to spoil the ballot and
receive another ballot.
(4) In jurisdictions using centrally based tabulators,
if a ballot is so rejected it shall be reviewed by a
bipartisan team using the following criteria:

SB 1132 33
(a) If a ballot is determined to be damaged, the
bipartisan team shall spoil the original ballot and
duplicate the voter's intent on the new ballot, provided
that there is an undisputed method of matching the duplicate
card with its original after it has been placed with the
remainder of the ballot cards from such precinct; and
(b) Voter intent shall be determined using the
following criteria:
a. There is a distinguishing mark in the printed oval
or divided arrow adjacent to the name of the candidate or
issue preference;
b. There is a distinguishing mark adjacent to the name
of the candidate or issue preference; or
c. The name of the candidate or issue preference is
circled.
(5) In jurisdictions using optical scan systems, a
valid vote for a write-in candidate shall include the
following:
(a) A distinguishing mark in the designated location
preceding the name of the candidate;
(b) The name of the candidate. If the name of the
candidate as written by the voter is substantially as
declared by the candidate it shall be counted, or in those
circumstances where the names of candidates are similar, the
names of candidates as shown on voter registration records
shall be counted; and
(c) The name of the office for which the candidate is
to be elected.
(6) Whenever a hand recount of votes of optical scan
ballots is ordered, the provisions of this subsection shall
be used to determine voter intent.

SB 1132 34
2.] (1) The election authority shall be responsible
for ensuring that the standards provided for in this
subsection are followed when counting ballots [cast using
paper ballots].
(2) Voter intent shall be determined using the
following criteria:
(a) There is a distinguishing mark in the square
adjacent to the name of the candidate or issue preference;
(b) There is a distinguishing mark adjacent to the
name of the candidate or issue preference; or
(c) The name of the candidate or issue preference is
circled.
(3) [In jurisdictions using paper ballots,] A valid
vote for a write-in candidate shall include the following:
(a) A distinguishing mark in the square immediately
preceding the name of the candidate;
(b) The name of the candidate. If the name of the
candidate as written by the voter is substantially as
declared by the candidate it shall be counted, or in those
circumstances where the names of candidates are similar, the
names of candidates as shown on voter registration records
shall be counted; and
(c) The name of the office for which the candidate is
to be elected.
(4) Whenever a hand recount of votes [of paper
ballots] is ordered, the provisions of this subsection shall
be used to determine voter intent.
[3.] 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
distinguishing mark indicating a general preference for or
against the candidates of one political party shall not be
considered a vote for or against any specific candidate.

SB 1132 35
115.459. At each polling place [using paper ballots],
after the polling place is closed, the election judges shall
(1) Certify in the tally book the number of ballots
cast, the number of identification certificates signed, the
number of rejected and spoiled ballots and the number of
ballots received at the polling place which were not cast at
the election. If the number of signed identification
certificates is not the same as the number of ballots cast,
the judges shall make a signed statement of the fact and the
reasons therefor if known and shall return the statement
with the statements of returns;
(2) Certify on two statements of returns the number of
votes received by each candidate and for and against each
question. No returns shall be signed in blank or before the
polls have closed and all proper votes cast at the polling
place have been counted;
(3) Certify that each statement made in the tally book
and on each statement of returns is correct. If any judge
declines to certify that all such statements are correct, he
shall state his reasons in writing, which shall be attached
to each statement of returns and returned with the statement
to the election authority.
115.461. 1. The tally book for each polling place
[using paper ballots] shall be in substantially the
following form:
Tally book for ______ precincts, at the general
(special, primary) election held on the ______ day
of ______, 20______ AB, CD, EF, and XP judges, and
ZR and LT, watchers and BH and SP challengers at
this polling place, were sworn as the law directs
before beginning their duties.

SB 1132 36
We hereby certify:
The number of ballots received at this polling
place is ______;
The information on the official ballots
received at this polling place is the same as
the information on the sample ballots received
at this polling place.
AB
CD Election Judges
EF
XP
We hereby certify:
The number of ballots cast at this polling
place is ______;
The number of identification certificates
signed at this polling place is ______;
The number of rejected ballots at this polling
place is ______;
The number of spoiled ballots at this polling
place is ______;
The number of ballots received at this polling
place which were not cast at this election is
______;
AB
CD
EF
XP

SB 1132 37
2. At each polling place [using paper ballots,] two
tally sheets shall be included in each tally book. The
tally sheets shall be in substantially the following form:
NAMES OF PERSONS VOTED FOR AND
FOR WHAT OFFICE AND THE NUMBER
OF VOTES CAST FOR EACH PERSON
Office Candidates Tally of Total Votes
Votes
MC
Governor HK
EH
Representative SS
in RK
Congress CB
VOTES FOR AND AGAINST EACH QUESTION
Question Tally of Tally of Total of Total of
votes FOR votes votes FOR votes
AGAINST AGAINST
1. To_____
______
______
2. To_____
______

SB 1132 38
__________________ __________________
Signature of Recording Signature of
Recording
Judge Judge
(of different
political party)
3. At each polling place [using paper ballots,] two
statements of returns shall be provided to the election
judges. The statements of returns shall be in substantially
the following form:
We hereby certify that MC had ______ votes for
governor, and HK had ______ votes for governor and
EH had ______ votes for governor; that SS had
______ votes for representative in Congress, etc.
We hereby certify that proposition number 1
received ______ votes for and ______ votes against;
constitutional amendment number 1 received ______
votes for and ______ votes against, etc.
We, the duly qualified and acting Judges of the
polling place for ______ precincts, at the general
(special, primary) election held on the ______ of
______, 20______, in ______ county (City of St.
Louis, Kansas City), Missouri do hereby certify
that the foregoing is a full and accurate return of
all votes cast at this polling place for all
candidates and for and against all questions.
AB
CD Election Judges
EF

SB 1132 39
XP
115.501. As soon as possible after an election [in
which paper ballots or ballot cards are used], the
verification board shall meet and check the addition and
figures on all tally sheets and statements of returns and
shall compare its record with the returns made by the
election judges and the election authority on the day of the
election. Before meeting, the verification board shall give
notice of the time and place of the meeting to each
independent and new party candidate and the chairman of the
county committee of each political party named on the ballot
at the election. The meeting and proceedings of the
verification board shall be open to a representative of each
independent candidate and political party named on the
ballot. If there is a discrepancy between the returns of
the election judges and the election authority and the
record of the verification board, the verification board
shall correct the returns made by the judges and election
authority to conform to its record. The corrected returns
shall supersede the returns made by the election judges and
the election authority on election day. Both the record and
the returns shall be retained by the election authority as
provided in section 115.493.
115.541. 1. Whenever a recount is ordered pursuant to
section 115.539, the court shall order all materials and
records relating to the contest brought before it, so that
the court has the same materials and records as the election
judges had while making the count and statements of
returns. The court shall have authority to pass upon the
form and determine the legality of the votes brought into

SB 1132 40
question and to determine the qualifications of any voter
whose vote is brought into question, provided that the name
of a voter upon a precinct register for the polling place
shall be prima facie evidence of the proper qualifications
of the voter. A comparison may be made between the
signatures on the identification certificates and those
which appear in the precinct registers, and no votes shall
be counted except the votes of registered voters and those
entitled to vote as provided in section 115.277 without
being registered. No votes of any person found by the court
to be unqualified to vote at the primary election shall be
counted.
2. Whenever a recount of votes [cast on paper ballots]
is ordered pursuant to section 115.539 or 115.601, the court
shall proceed to open and count the votes and, after the
count has been completed, shall tabulate by voting district
the votes cast for the contestant and the contestee.
[3. Whenever a recount of votes cast on any voting
machine is ordered pursuant to section 115.539 or 115.601,
the court shall make visible the registering counters of the
machine and, without unlocking the machine against voting,
shall record the votes cast on the machine.
4. Whenever a recount of votes cast on ballot cards is
ordered pursuant to section 115.539 or 115.601, the court
shall supervise a test of the automatic tabulating equipment
conducted in the manner provided in section 115.233 and
shall cause the votes to be recounted automatically or may
order a hand count of the votes. In its discretion, the
court may order a new computer program to be made, which
shall be tested in the manner provided in section 115.233
before the votes in question are recounted automatically.]

SB 1132 41
115.585. 1. Whenever a recount is ordered pursuant to
section 115.583 or 115.601, the court or legislative body
trying the contest shall issue a writ to each election
authority responsible for conducting the election in any
area in which an alleged irregularity occurred, commanding
the election authority to prepare its office and all records
and materials relating to the contested election for the
recount. Such writ shall be served immediately on the
election authority by the sheriff of the county. Upon
receipt of a writ, each election authority shall set a day,
not more than twenty days after receiving the writ, on which
it will have its office and all records and materials
relating to the contested election prepared. Immediately
upon setting the day, the election authority shall send by
certified or registered mail a notice to the court or
legislative body issuing the writ. The notice shall set
forth the day selected by the election authority for the
recount.
2. Whenever a recount is ordered pursuant to section
115.583, the court or legislative body shall have authority
to pass upon the form and determine the legality of the
votes brought into question and to determine the
qualifications of any voter whose vote is brought into
question, provided that the name of a voter upon a precinct
register for the polling place shall be prima facie evidence
of the proper qualifications of the voter. A comparison may
be made between the signatures on the identification
certificates and those which appear in the precinct
registers, and no votes shall be counted except the votes of
registered voters and those entitled to vote as provided in
subsection 2 of section 115.137 and section 115.277 without

SB 1132 42
being registered. No votes of any person found by the court
to be unqualified to vote at the election shall be counted.
3. Whenever a recount of votes [cast on paper ballots]
is ordered pursuant to section 115.583 or 115.601, the court
or legislative body shall proceed to open and count the
votes and, after the count has been completed, shall
tabulate by voting district the votes cast for the
contestant and the contestee.
[4. Whenever a recount of votes cast on any voting
machine is ordered pursuant to section 115.583 or 115.601,
the court or legislative body shall make visible the
registering counters of the machine and, without unlocking
the machine against voting, shall record the votes cast on
the machine.
5. Whenever a recount of votes cast on ballot cards is
ordered pursuant to section 115.583 or 115.601, the court or
legislative body shall supervise a test of the automatic
tabulating equipment conducted in the manner provided in
section 115.233 and shall cause the votes to be recounted
automatically, or may order a hand count of the votes. In
its discretion, the court or legislative body may order a
new computer program to be made, which shall be tested in
the manner provided in section 115.233 before the votes in
question are recounted automatically.]
115.631. The following offenses, and any others
specifically so described by law, shall be class one
election offenses and are deemed felonies connected with the
exercise of the right of suffrage. Conviction for any of
these offenses shall be punished by imprisonment of not more
than five years or by fine of not less than two thousand
five hundred dollars but not more than ten thousand dollars
or by both such imprisonment and fine:

SB 1132 43
(1) Willfully and falsely making any certificate,
affidavit, or statement required to be made pursuant to any
provision of this chapter, including but not limited to
statements specifically required to be made "under penalty
of perjury"; or in any other manner knowingly furnishing
false information to an election authority or election
official engaged in any lawful duty or action in such a way
as to hinder or mislead the authority or official in the
performance of official duties. If an individual willfully
and falsely makes any certificate, affidavit, or statement
required to be made under section 115.155, including but not
limited to statements specifically required to be made
"under penalty of perjury", such individual shall be guilty
of a class D felony;
(2) Voting more than once or voting at any election
knowing that the person is not entitled to vote or that the
person has already voted on the same day at another location
inside or outside the state of Missouri;
(3) Procuring any person to vote knowing the person is
not lawfully entitled to vote or knowingly procuring an
illegal vote to be cast at any election;
(4) Applying for a ballot in the name of any other
person, whether the name be that of a person living or dead
or of a fictitious person, or applying for a ballot in his
or her own or any other name after having once voted at the
election inside or outside the state of Missouri;
(5) Aiding, abetting or advising another person to
vote knowing the person is not legally entitled to vote or
knowingly aiding, abetting or advising another person to
cast an illegal vote;

SB 1132 44
(6) An election judge knowingly causing or permitting
any ballot to be in the ballot box at the opening of the
polls and before the voting commences;
(7) Knowingly furnishing any voter with a false or
fraudulent or bogus ballot, or knowingly practicing any
fraud upon a voter to induce him or her to cast a vote which
will be rejected, or otherwise defrauding him or her of his
or her vote;
(8) An election judge knowingly placing or attempting
to place or permitting any ballot, or paper having the
semblance of a ballot, to be placed in a ballot box at any
election unless the ballot is offered by a qualified voter
as provided by law;
(9) Knowingly placing or attempting to place or
causing to be placed any false or fraudulent or bogus ballot
in a ballot box at any election;
(10) Knowingly removing any legal ballot from a ballot
box for the purpose of changing the true and lawful count of
any election or in any other manner knowingly changing the
true and lawful count of any election;
(11) Knowingly altering, defacing, damaging,
destroying or concealing any ballot after it has been voted
for the purpose of changing the lawful count of any election;
(12) Knowingly altering, defacing, damaging,
destroying or concealing any poll list, report, affidavit,
return or certificate for the purpose of changing the lawful
count of any election;
(13) On the part of any person authorized to receive,
tally or count a poll list, tally sheet or election return,
receiving, tallying or counting a poll list, tally sheet or
election return the person knows is fraudulent, forged or

SB 1132 45
counterfeit, or knowingly making an incorrect account of any
election;
(14) On the part of any person whose duty it is to
grant certificates of election, or in any manner declare the
result of an election, granting a certificate to a person
the person knows is not entitled to receive the certificate,
or declaring any election result the person knows is based
upon fraudulent, fictitious or illegal votes or returns;
(15) Willfully destroying or damaging any official
ballots, whether marked or unmarked, after the ballots have
been prepared for use at an election and during the time
they are required by law to be preserved in the custody of
the election judges or the election authority;
(16) Willfully tampering with, disarranging, altering
the information on, defacing, impairing or destroying any
voting machine [or marking device] after the machine [or
marking device] has been prepared for use at an election and
during the time it is required by law to remain locked and
sealed with intent to impair the functioning of the machine
[or marking device] at an election, mislead any voter at the
election, or to destroy or change the count or record of
votes on such machine;
(17) Registering to vote knowing the person is not
legally entitled to register or registering in the name of
another person, whether the name be that of a person living
or dead or of a fictitious person;
(18) Procuring any other person to register knowing
the person is not legally entitled to register, or aiding,
abetting or advising another person to register knowing the
person is not legally entitled to register;

SB 1132 46
100 (19) Knowingly preparing, altering or substituting any
101 computer program or other counting equipment to give an
102 untrue or unlawful result of an election;
103 (20) On the part of any person assisting a blind or
104 disabled person to vote, knowingly failing to cast such
105 person's vote as such person directs;
106 (21) On the part of any registration or election
107 official, permitting any person to register to vote or to
108 vote when such official knows the person is not legally
109 entitled to register or not legally entitled to vote;
110 (22) On the part of a notary public acting in his or
111 her official capacity, knowingly violating any of the
112 provisions of this chapter or any provision of law
113 pertaining to elections;
114 (23) Violation of any of the provisions of sections
115 115.275 to 115.303, or of any provision of law pertaining to
116 absentee voting;
117 (24) Assisting a person to vote knowing such person is
118 not legally entitled to such assistance, or while assisting
119 a person to vote who is legally entitled to such assistance,
120 in any manner coercing, requesting or suggesting that the
121 voter vote for or against, or refrain from voting on any
122 question, ticket or candidate;
123 (25) Engaging in any act of violence, destruction of
124 property having a value of five hundred dollars or more, or
125 threatening an act of violence with the intent of denying a
126 person's lawful right to vote or to participate in the
127 election process; and
128 (26) Knowingly providing false information about
129 election procedures for the purpose of preventing any person
130 from going to the polls.

SB 1132 47
115.633. The following offenses, and any others
specifically so described by law, shall be class two
election offenses and are deemed felonies not connected with
the exercise of the right of suffrage. Conviction for any
of these offenses shall be punished by imprisonment of not
more than five years or by fine of not less than two
thousand five hundred dollars but not more than ten thousand
dollars or by both such imprisonment and fine:
(1) on the day of election or before the counting of
votes is completed, willfully concealing, breaking, or
destroying any ballot box used or intended to be used at
such election or willfully or fraudulently concealing or
removing any ballot box from the custody of the election
judges;
(2) Willfully tampering with, disarranging, defacing,
materially altering, impairing, or destroying any voting
machine [or automatic tabulating equipment] owned or leased
by or loaned to an election authority.
115.655. 1. The election authority shall provide for
the delivery of official ballots to each qualified voter:
(1) By first class mail to the mailing address of each
voter as it appears on the registration records of the
election authority on the deadline specified in subsection 1
of section 115.135 for registration. Each ballot so mailed
shall be placed by the election authority in an envelope
which is prominently marked "Do Not Forward" and mailed not
later than the tenth day prior to the election; or
(2) By delivering the ballot to the residential
address of the voter as it appears on the registration
records of the election authority on the deadline specified
in subsection 1 of section 115.135 for registration. Such
delivery shall be made by a bi-partisan team appointed by

SB 1132 48
the election authority from lists submitted under the
provisions of section 115.087.
Voters shall also be provided with a return identification
envelope, a secrecy envelope, and instructions sufficient to
describe the voting process.
2. Upon receipt of the ballot, the voter shall mark
it, place and seal the marked ballot in the secrecy envelope
supplied with the ballot, place and seal the sealed secrecy
envelope containing the marked ballot in the return
identification envelope supplied with the ballot which has
been signed by the voter and then return the marked ballot
to the election authority by either:
(1) United States mail; or
(2) Personally delivering the ballot to the office of
the election authority.
3. The election authority may provide additional sites
for return delivery of ballots. The election authority may
provide for the payment of postage on the return of ballots.
4. The return identification envelope shall be in
substantially the following form:
PLEASE PRINT:
NAME ______
I declare under penalty of perjury, a felony, that I
am a resident and a qualified voter for this election
as shown on voter registration records and that I have
voted the enclosed ballot and am returning it in
compliance with sections 115.650 to 115.660, RSMo, and
have not and will not vote more than one ballot in
this election.

SB 1132 49
I also understand that failure to complete the
information below will invalidate my ballot.
__________________
Signature
__________________
Residence Address
__________________
Mailing Address (if different)
5. If the ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost or not
received by the voter, the voter may obtain a replacement
ballot from the election authority as provided in this
subsection. A voter seeking a replacement ballot shall sign
a statement verified on oath or affirmation, on a form
prescribed by the election authority that the ballot was
destroyed, spoiled, lost or not received. The applicant
shall deliver the statement to the election authority before
noon on the date of the election. The applicant may mail
the statement to the election authority; but, no election
authority shall transmit a ballot by mail under this
subsection unless the application is received prior to the
close of business on the fifth day prior to the election.
When an application is timely received under this
subsection, the election authority shall deliver the ballot
to the voter if the voter is present in the office of the
election authority, or promptly transmit the ballot by mail
to the voter at the address contained in the application,
except when prohibited in this subsection. The election

SB 1132 50
authority shall keep a record of each replacement ballot
provided under this subsection.
6. A ballot must be returned by mail or received in
the office of the election authority or at a site provided
for receipt of ballots by the election authority no later
than 7:00 p.m. on election day. The election authority
shall transmit all return identification envelopes to a team
or teams of judges of not less than four, with an equal
number from each major political party. The judges shall be
selected by the election authority from lists submitted
under the provisions of section 115.087, and subscribe to
the oath provided in section 115.091. Upon receipt of such
envelopes the judges shall verify the signature of each
voter on the return identification envelope with the
signature of the voter on the voter registration records.
Such verification may commence at time prior to the day of
the election. The election authority shall adopt procedures
for securing and accounting for all verified return
identification envelopes. The secrecy envelope shall not be
separated from the return identification envelope before
ballots are counted. Ballots may be counted at any time on
election day provided the results are not released before
7:00 p.m. on that day. Counting of ballots [may] shall be
done by hand [or through the utilization of automatic
tabulating equipment] and shall be governed by the
applicable sections of this chapter.
[115.227. All provisions of law not
inconsistent with sections 115.225 to 115.235
shall apply with full force and effect to
elections in each jurisdiction using an
electronic voting system.]
[115.229. 1. An electronic voting system
may be used at any primary election if it has

SB 1132 51
been approved by the secretary of state,
complies with the provisions of section 115.225,
and if the automatic tabulating equipment will
reject each vote on which a voter has voted for
candidates of more than one party.
2. An electronic voting system may be used
at any other election if it has been approved by
the secretary of state and complies with the
provisions of section 115.225.]
[115.233. Within fourteen days prior to an
election at which an electronic voting system is
to be used, the election authority shall have
the automatic tabulating equipment tested to
ascertain that the equipment is in compliance
with the law and that it will correctly count
the votes cast for all offices and on all
questions. At least forty-eight hours prior to
the test, notice of the time and place of the
test shall be mailed to each independent and new
party candidate and the chairman of the county
committee of each established political party
named on the ballot. The test shall be observed
by at least two persons designated by the
election authority, one from each major
political party, and shall be open to
representatives of the political parties,
candidates, the news media and the public. The
test shall be conducted by processing a
preaudited group of ballots. If any error is
detected, the cause shall be ascertained and
corrected, and an errorless count shall be made
before the tabulating equipment is approved.]
[115.235. In jurisdictions where
electronic voting systems are used, the election
authority shall cause the marking devices to be
put in order, set, adjusted and made ready for
voting, before they are delivered to polling
places on election day.]
[115.249. No voting machine shall be used
unless it:
(1) Permits voting in absolute secrecy;

SB 1132 52
(2) Permits each voter to vote for as many
candidates for each office as he is lawfully
entitled to vote for, and no other;
(3) Permits each voter to vote for or
against as many questions as he is lawfully
entitled to vote on, and no more;
(4) Provides facilities for each voter to
cast as many write-in votes for each office as
he is lawfully entitled to cast;
(5) Permits each voter in a primary
election to vote for the candidates of only one
party announced by the voter in advance;
(6) Correctly registers or records and
accurately counts all votes cast for each
candidate and for and against each question;
(7) Is provided with a lock or locks which
prevent any movement of the voting or
registering mechanism and any tampering with the
mechanism;
(8) Is provided with a protective counter
or other device whereby any operation of the
machine before or after an election will be
detected;
(9) Is provided with a counter which shows
at all times during the election how many people
have voted on the machine;
(10) Is provided with a proper light which
enables each voter, while voting, to clearly see
the ballot labels.]
[115.255. The use of separate paper
ballots for questions and candidates in polling
places shall not be prohibited where electronic
voting machines are used.]
[115.257. 1. In jurisdictions where
electronic voting machines are used, the
election authority shall cause the voting
machines to be put in order, set, adjusted and
made ready for voting before they are delivered
to polling places.
2. At least five days before preparing
electronic voting machines for any election,
notice of the time and place of such preparation
shall be mailed to each independent candidate

SB 1132 53
and the chairman of the county committee of each
established political party named on the
ballot. The preparation shall be watched by two
observers designated by the election authority,
one from each major political party, and shall
be open to representatives of the political
parties, candidates, the news media and the
public.
3. When an electronic voting machine has
been examined by such observers and shown to be
in good working order, the machine shall be
locked against voting. The observers shall
certify the vote count on each machine is set at
zero.
4. After an electronic voting machine has
been properly prepared and locked, its keys
shall be retained by the election authority and
delivered to the election judges along with the
other election supplies.
5. For the purpose of processing absentee
ballots, cast by voters in person in the office
of the election authority that is deemed
designated as a polling place, the election
authority may cause voting machines, if used, to
be put in order, set, adjusted, tested, and made
ready for voting within one business day of the
printing of absentee ballots as provided in
section 115.281. The election authority shall
have the recording counter except for the
protective counter on the voting machine set to
zero (000). After the voting machines have been
made ready for voting, the election authority
shall not permit any person to handle any voting
machine, except voters while they are voting and
others expressly authorized by the election
authority. The election authority shall neither
be nor permit any other person to be in any
position or near any position that enables the
authority or person to see how any absentee
voter votes or has voted.
6. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
the on-site storage of electronic voting
machines and the preparation of the electronic
machines for voting, provided the electronic

SB 1132 54
voting machines are put in order, set, adjusted
and made ready for voting as provided in
subsections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5 of this section.]
[115.259. At each polling place using
voting machines, the exterior of the voting
machines shall be in plain view of the election
judges. The election judges shall not be nor
permit any other person to be in any position,
or near any position, that enables them to see
how any voter votes or has voted. The election
judges may inspect any machine as necessary to
make sure the ballot label is in its proper
place and that the machine has not been damaged.]
[115.261. During an election, no door,
compartment, or lock shall be unlocked or
opened, except by direction of the election
authority, and then only for good and sufficient
reason. If the door, compartment, or lock on
any machine is opened by the election authority
or his representative, the reason for such
opening shall be stated in writing, signed by
the election authority or his representative and
attached to one statement of returns.]
[115.263. After the opening of the polls,
the election judges shall not permit any person
to handle any electronic voting machine, except
voters while they are voting and others
expressly authorized by the election authority
or state law.]
[115.265. If any electronic voting machine
at a polling place becomes inoperative, the
election judges shall immediately notify the
election authority. If possible, the election
authority shall repair or replace the machine.
If an electronic voting machine is replaced with
another machine, the votes on both machines
shall be recorded at the close of the polls and
shall be added together in determining the
results of the election. If the inoperative
machine cannot be repaired, and no other machine
is available for use, paper ballots made as
nearly as practicable to the official ballot may

SB 1132 55
be used. At the close of the polls, the votes
on paper ballots and the votes on the electronic
voting machines shall be recorded and shall be
added together in determining the results of the
election. All paper ballots used pursuant to
this section shall be used in accordance with
the laws affecting paper ballots and shall be
returned to the election authority as paper
ballots are returned with a statement describing
how and why the paper ballots were voted.]
[115.267. Any election authority may
adopt, experiment with or abandon any electronic
voting system approved for use in the state, or
may lease one or more electronic voting machines
or other equipment, either with or without
option to purchase, and may use any authorized
electronic voting equipment at any polling place
in its jurisdiction.]
[115.269. For the purpose of giving
instructions on their use, any election
authority may designate suitable times and
places for the exhibition and demonstration of
its electronic voting machines. During such
instructions, the electronic voting machines may
contain sample ballot labels which show the
names of offices and fictitious candidates. No
electronic voting machine shall be used for
instruction after it has been prepared for use
at an election, unless it is prepared again
prior to the election.]
[115.271. 1. While its electronic voting
machines are not in use, the election authority
may permit civic or educational organizations to
use the machines for the purpose of giving
instructions on their use.
2. Any election authority may rent its
electronic voting machines to any other group
for use in its elections.
3. At the discretion of the election
authority, the machines may be transported at
the expense of the organizations using them.
The president or secretary of each organization

SB 1132 56
using such machines shall sign a receipt
therefor and shall agree in writing that the
organization assumes liability for any damage or
loss occurring to the machines up to the time
they are returned to the election authority and
will return the machines by a designated time.]
[115.273. All provisions of law not
inconsistent with the provisions of sections
115.249 to 115.271 shall apply with full force
and effect to elections in jurisdictions using
electronic voting machines.]
[115.467. 1. As soon as the polls close
in each polling place using an electronic voting
system, the election judges shall secure the
marking devices against further voting and begin
to count the write-in votes. If earlier
counting of write-in votes is begun pursuant to
section 115.469, the election judges shall
complete the count in the manner provided in
this section. Once begun, the count shall not
be adjourned or postponed until all proper write-
in votes in the ballot box have been counted.
2. The election judges shall remove the
ballot cards from the ballot box and separate
the ballots with write-in votes from those
without write-in votes. If there is a separate
form for write-in votes, all forms on which
write-in votes have been recorded shall be
consecutively numbered, starting with the number
one, and the same number shall be placed on the
ballot card of the voter. Where tallying of
write-in votes is to be done at the polling
place, the election judges shall compare the
write-in votes with the votes cast on the ballot
card. If the total number of votes including
write-in votes for any office exceeds the number
allowed by law, or if a voter has voted more
than once for the same person for the same
office at the same election, a notation of the
fact shall be noted on the back of the ballot
card, and it shall be returned with the write-in
form, if any, to the counting location in an
envelope marked "DEFECTIVE BALLOTS".

SB 1132 57
3. All proper write-in votes shall be
read, recorded and counted as provided in
sections 115.449 and 115.453. No write-in vote
shall be counted for any candidate for any
office whose name appears on the ballot label as
a candidate for the office, except when more
than one person is to be nominated or elected to
an office. When more than one person is to be
nominated or elected to an office, the voter may
write in the names of one or more persons whose
names do not appear on the ballot label with or
without the names of one or more persons whose
names do appear.
4. If any ballot card is damaged so that
it cannot properly be counted by the automatic
tabulating equipment, the fact shall be noted on
the back of the ballot card and it shall be
returned to the counting location in the
envelope marked "DEFECTIVE BALLOTS".]
[115.469. 1. If authorized by the
election authority, the election judges at any
polling place using an electronic voting system
may read and record write-in votes before the
close of the polls and may send other voted
ballots to the counting place. If so
authorized, the election judges shall use one
ballot box for the deposit of ballots during the
first five hours of voting. Between eleven
o'clock in the morning and twelve noon, the
receiving judges shall deliver the ballot box to
the counting and recording judges, who shall
give the receiving judges a second empty ballot
box. The second ballot box shall be shown to be
empty and locked in the manner provided in
section 115.423. The second ballot box shall
not be opened or removed from public view from
the time it is shown to be empty until the time
the polls close. The ballot box containing the
voted ballots shall be taken to a private area
within the polling place, and the write-in votes
shall be read and recorded in the manner
provided in section 115.467.

SB 1132 58
2. If early counting of write-in votes is
begun pursuant to this section, the election
judges shall, after counting and recording all
proper write-in votes, separate all ballot
cards, except defective ballot cards, from the
write-in forms if any. The ballots which do not
have write-in votes shall then be sent to the
counting place in the same manner as ballots are
sent upon the close of the polls. The election
judges shall enclose the ballot cards, the
envelope marked "DEFECTIVE BALLOTS", and all
write-in forms containing proper votes, in a
container designated by the election authority.
The container shall be securely sealed in such a
manner that if the container is opened, the seal
will be broken beyond repair. On the outside of
the container, the location of the polling place
and the date of the election shall be printed.
After sealing, the container shall be closely
watched by the election judges until it is
delivered to the counting location.
3. If early counting of write-in votes is
begun pursuant to this section, the election
authority shall appoint a team of employees or
election judges who shall, between the hours of
eleven o'clock in the morning and three o'clock
in the afternoon, receive the ballot container
from the election judges at the polling place
and immediately deliver it to the counting
location. Each team appointed pursuant to this
subsection shall consist of two members, one
from each major political party. If any ballot
container is not sealed when it is delivered to
the counting location, the election official
receiving the container shall make a statement
of the fact which includes the location of the
polling place and the date of the election
printed on the container and the reason the
container is not sealed, if known.
4. After delivery to the counting
location, any ballot which is damaged and cannot
be properly counted by the automatic tabulating
equipment may be handcounted or duplicated in

SB 1132 59
the manner provided in subsection 3 of section
115.477.
5. After delivery to the counting
location, the proper votes on each ballot card
may be transferred to magnetic tapes. Under no
circumstances shall any such tape be read or
interpreted until after the time fixed by law
for the close of the polls and then only in the
manner provided in section 115.477.
6. Write-in ballots may also be counted as
provided in section 115.451.]
[115.471. At each polling place using an
electronic voting system, after the polling
place is closed, the election judges shall
(1) Certify in the tally book: the number
of ballots cast by reconciling the ballot stubs
against the number of identification
certificates signed; the number of defective and
spoiled ballots; the number of ballots with
write-in votes; and the number of ballots
received at the polling place which were not
cast at the election. If the number of signed
identification certificates is not the same as
the number of ballots cast, the judges shall
make a signed statement of the fact and the
reasons therefor, if known, and shall return the
statement with the statements of returns;
(2) Where tallying of write-in votes is to
be done at the polling place, certify on two
statements of returns the number of write-in
votes received by each candidate. No returns
shall be signed in blank or before the polls
have closed and all proper write-in votes cast
at the polling place have been counted;
(3) Certify that each statement made in
the tally book and on each statement of returns
is correct. If any judge declines to certify
that all such statements are correct, he shall
state his reasons in writing, which shall be
attached to each statement of returns and
returned with the statement to the election
authority.]

SB 1132 60
[115.473. 1. The tally book for each
polling place using an electronic voting system
shall be in substantially the following form:
Tally book for ______ precincts, at the general
(special, primary) election held on the ______ day of
______, 20______ AB, CD, EF, and XP judges; and ZR
and LT, watchers; and BH and SP, challengers, at this
polling place, were sworn as the law directs before
beginning their duties.
We hereby certify:
The number of ballots received at this polling
place is ______;
The information on the ballot cards and ballot
labels received at this polling place is the same
as the information on the sample ballots received
at this polling place.
AB
CD Election Judges
EF
XP
We hereby certify:
The number of ballots cast at this polling place
is ______;
The number of identification certificates signed
at this polling place is ______;
The number of defective ballots at this polling
place is ______;
The number of spoiled ballots at this polling
place is ______;
The number of voters casting proper write-in votes
at this polling place is ______;
The number of ballots received at this polling
place which were not cast at this election is
______;
AB

SB 1132 61
CD Election Judges
EF
XP
2. Where tallying of write-in votes is to
be done at the polling place, at each polling
place using an electronic voting system, two
tally sheets shall be included in each tally
book. The tally sheets shall be used to record
the proper write-in votes and shall be in
substantially the same form provided in
subsection 2 of section 115.461.
3. Where tallying of write-in votes is to
be done at the polling place, at each polling
place using an electronic voting system, two
statements of returns shall be provided to the
election judges. The statements of returns
shall be in substantially the following form:
We hereby certify that BK had ______ write-in votes
for governor, and SF had ______ write-in votes for
governor, that JH had ______ write-in votes for
representative in Congress, etc. We, the duly
qualified and acting judges of the polling place for
______ precincts, at the general (special, primary)
election held on the ______ day of ______, 20______,
in ______ County (City of St. Louis, Kansas City),
Missouri, do hereby certify that the foregoing is a
full and accurate return of all write-in votes cast
at this polling place for all candidates.
AB
CD Election Judges
EF
XP ]
[115.475. 1. As soon as possible after
signing the statements of returns, the election

SB 1132 62
judges shall seal and enclose the ballots,
electronic voting machine memory cards, write-in
forms containing no votes, the unused ballots
and other election supplies in containers
designated by the election authority.
2. Immediately after the election
materials have been placed in the proper
containers, the two supervisory judges shall
together deliver the containers to the counting
location or other place designated by the
election authority. If any container is not
sealed when it is delivered to the counting
location or other place designated by the
election authority, the election official
receiving the container shall make a statement
of the fact which includes the location of the
polling place and the date of the election
printed on the container and the reason the
container is not sealed, if known.
3. If the election authority has directed
the supervisory judges to deliver election
materials to a place other than the counting
location, the election authority shall appoint
at least one team of election judges who shall
receive the containers from the supervisory
judges and immediately deliver them to the
counting location. Each team appointed pursuant
to this subsection shall consist of two election
judges or employees of the election authority,
one from each major political party.]
[115.477. 1. In each jurisdiction using
an electronic voting system, all proceedings at
the counting location shall be under the
direction of the election authority. The
election authority shall appoint two judges, one
from each major political party, to be present
and observe the count. The counting shall be
open to the public, but no persons, except those
employed and authorized for the purpose, shall
touch any ballot, ballot container or return.
2. The automatic tabulating equipment
shall produce a return showing the total number
of votes cast for each candidate and on each

SB 1132 63
question at each polling place and in the
jurisdiction as a whole.
3. If any ballot is damaged and cannot be
properly counted by the automatic tabulating
equipment, it may be handcounted in the manner
provided for absentee ballots, or a true
duplicate copy may be made of the defective
ballot. If any ballot contains a number of
votes and write-in votes for any office which
exceeds the number allowed by law, it may be
handcounted in the manner provided for absentee
ballots, a true duplicate copy be made which
does not include the invalid votes or, at the
discretion of the election judges, a self-
adhesive removable label, sensitized, may be
placed over any mark to allow the ballot to be
processed through the automatic tabulating
equipment. The duplication of each ballot shall
be closely observed by two election judges or
employees of the election authority, one from
each major political party. Each duplicate
ballot shall be clearly labeled "duplicate",
shall bear a serial number which shall be
recorded on the defective ballot, and shall be
counted in lieu of the defective ballot.]
[115.479. In each jurisdiction using an
electronic voting system, the election authority
shall, after the count has been completed and
the results received, have the automatic
tabulating equipment tested to ascertain that
the equipment has correctly counted the votes
for all offices and on all questions. The test
shall be observed by at least two persons
designated by the election authority, one from
each major political party, and shall be open to
the public. The test shall be conducted by
processing the same preaudited group of ballots
used in the preelection test provided for in
section 115.233. If any error is detected, the
cause shall be ascertained and corrected, and an
errorless count shall be made before the final
results are announced. After the completion of
an errorless count, the programs and the ballots

SB 1132 64
shall be sealed, retained and disposed of as
provided for paper ballots.]
[115.481. The final and correct return
printed by the automatic tabulating equipment
added to the write-in, absentee and handcounted
votes shall be the official return of each
polling place and the jurisdiction.]
[115.483. 1. As soon as the polls close
in each polling place using electronic voting
machines, the election judges shall secure each
voting machine against further voting and
proceed to count the votes. Once begun, the
count shall not be adjourned or postponed until
all proper votes have been counted.
2. The election judges shall open the
counting compartment on each voting machine or,
if a machine is equipped with a device for
printing, embossing or photographing the
registering counters, the judges shall operate
the machine to produce a record of the
counters. One counting judge shall read the
total vote cast for each candidate and for and
against each question on each machine. The
other counting judge shall watch and verify each
total as it is being read from the recording
counters or from the record of the counters.
The two recording judges shall each record the
votes cast for each candidate and for and
against each question as they are called out and
verified by the counting judges.
3. All proper write-in votes shall be
read, recorded and counted as provided in
sections 115.449 and 115.453. No write-in vote
shall be counted for any candidate for any
office whose name appears on the ballot label as
a candidate for the office, except when more
than one person is to be nominated or elected to
an office. When more than one person is to be
nominated or elected to an office, the voter may
write in the names of one or more persons whose
names do not appear on the ballot label with or
without the names of one or more persons whose
names do appear. No write-in vote shall be

SB 1132 65
counted unless it is cast in the appropriate
place on the machine.
4. If more than one voting machine is used
in a polling place, the election judges shall
read, verify and record all the totals from the
first machine before proceeding to the second,
and so on, until all of the totals on each
machine in the polling place have been read,
verified and recorded. The total number of
votes from each machine shall be added to the
write-in votes to determine the total vote for
each candidate and for and against each
question.]
[115.495. 1. After being secured against
further voting by the election judges,
electronic voting machines shall remain secured
for the period provided by law for filing an
election contest and as much longer as may be
necessary or advisable because of any threatened
or pending contest, grand jury investigation, or
civil or criminal case relating to the
election. During this time, the electronic
voting machines shall not be unsecured, except
upon order of a court, grand jury or legislative
body trying an election contest.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section to the contrary,
when an election is required by law to be held
after an election during any period of time
described in subsection 1 of this section, the
data of the electronic voting machine relating
to the initial election shall be removed and
secured and such machine shall be made available
for use in the subsequent election.]
[115.503. 1. As soon as possible after an
election in which electronic voting machines are
used, the verification board, or a bipartisan
committee appointed by the verification board,
shall inspect each secured electronic voting
machine and record the votes cast on the
machine. In precincts where electronic voting
machines equipped with printed election returns
mechanisms are used, the counter compartment

SB 1132 66
shall not be opened and the original and
duplicate originals of the printed return sheets
of the votes cast on questions and for
candidates regularly nominated, or who have duly
filed, together with the tabulation and
inclusion of any votes written in on the paper
roll for those not regularly nominated, or who
have not filed, shall constitute the official
return sheet for the votes cast on that machine,
when properly certified by the precinct election
officers. One copy of such printed return sheet
shall be returned to the election authority and
retained by it for not less than one year. Any
bipartisan committee appointed pursuant to this
subsection shall consist of at least two people,
one from each major political party, who shall
be appointed in the same manner and possess the
same qualifications as election judges.
2. After the verification board or
committee has completed its inspection and
record, it shall compare the record with the
returns made by the election judges on election
day. If there is a discrepancy between the
returns of the election judges and the record of
the verification board or committee, the
verification board shall correct the returns
made by the judges to conform to its record.
The corrected returns shall supersede the
returns made by the election judges on election
day. Both the record and the returns shall be
retained by the election authority as provided
in section 115.493.]
Section B. Section A of this act shall become
effective on January 1, 2027.
✓